Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 1. General Provisions

§ 5201.
Purpose and effect.

In order to implement State policy and safeguard the public welfare, a person shall not engage in the practice of forestry unless currently licensed under this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 166

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 5202.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Director” means the Director of the Office of Professional Regulation.

“Disciplinary action” means any action taken against a licensee for unprofessional conduct.

“Forester” means a person who is licensed to practice forestry under this chapter.

“Forestry” means the science, art, and practice of creating, managing, using, and conserving forests and associated resources to meet desired goals, needs, and values, including timber management, wildlife management, biodiversity management, and watershed management. Forestry science consists of those biological, physical, quantitative, managerial, and social sciences that are applied to forest management. Forestry services include investigations, consultations, timber inventory, and appraisal, development of forest management plans, and responsible supervision of forest management or other forestry activities on public or private lands.
(4) (A) “Forestry” means the science, art, and practice of creating, managing, using, and conserving forests and associated resources to meet desired goals, needs, and values, including timber management, wildlife management, biodiversity management, and watershed management. Forestry science consists of those biological, physical, quantitative, managerial, and social sciences that are applied to forest management. Forestry services include investigations, consultations, timber inventory, and appraisal, development of forest management plans, and responsible supervision of forest management or other forestry activities on public or private lands.

“Forestry” does not include services for the physical implementation of cutting, hauling, handling, or processing of forest products or for the physical implementation of silvicultural treatments and practices.

“License” means a current authorization granted by the Director permitting the practice of forestry pursuant to this chapter.

“SAF” means the Society of American Foresters.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 166

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 5203.
Prohibitions; offenses.

It shall be a violation of this chapter for any person, including any corporation, association, or individual, to:

sell or fraudulently obtain or furnish any forestry degree, diploma, certificate of registration, license, or any other related document or record or to aid or abet in so doing;

practice forestry under cover of any degree, diploma, registration, license, or related document or record illegally or fraudulently obtained, or signed or issued unlawfully or under fraudulent representation;

practice forestry unless licensed to do so under the provisions of this chapter;

represent himself or herself as being licensed in this State to practice forestry or use in connection with a name any words, letters, signs, or figures that imply that a person is a forester when not licensed under this chapter; or

practice forestry during the time a license issued under this chapter is suspended or revoked.

Any person violating this section shall be subject to the penalties provided in

3 V.S.A. § 127

.

When considering a violation of this chapter, the Director shall recognize that, in appropriate circumstances, loggers and log buyers may make investigations, consultations, timber inventories, and appraisals and may responsibly conduct harvesting activities on private land.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 166

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 5204.
Exemptions.

The following shall not require a license under this chapter:

An individual, college or university, family, family trust, or business from practicing forestry on his, her, or its own lands, provided that a business may only practice forestry on an aggregate of not more than 400 acres of its own lands.

The practice of any other occupation or profession by a person duly licensed or otherwise authorized under the laws of this State.

An individual from carrying out forest practices when acting under the general supervision of a forester or acting as an expert consultant on work related to forestry, such as forest certification audits or the study of hydrology or wildlife biology.
(3) (A) An individual from carrying out forest practices when acting under the general supervision of a forester or acting as an expert consultant on work related to forestry, such as forest certification audits or the study of hydrology or wildlife biology.

As used in subdivision (A) of this subdivision (3), “general supervision” means the forester need not be on-site when the individual performs the work described in subdivision (A), but shall maintain continued involvement in and accept professional responsibility for that work.

Unlicensed professional activities within or relating to forests, if such activities do not involve the application of forestry principles or judgment and do not require forestry education, training, and experience to ensure competent performance.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 166

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.